Alabama, session 2026rs, HB260.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
44 Section 1. Sections 35-8A-104, 35-8A-108, 35-8A-110,
45 35-8A-205, 35-8A-216, 35-8A-302, 35-8A-308, 35-8A-309,
46 35-8A-403, 35-8A-408, and 35-8A-414 of the Code of Alabama
47 1975, is amended to read as follows:
48 "§35-8A-104
49 Except as expressly provided in this chapter, the
50 provisions of this chapter may not be varied by agreement, and
51 the rights conferred by this chapter may not be waived. A
52 declarant may not act under a power of attorney, consent,
53 waiver, or use any other device, to evade the limitations or
54 prohibitions of this chapter or the declaration."
55 "§35-8A-108
56 The principles of law and equity, including the law of
Page 2

The principles of law and equity, including the law of
HB260 INTRODUCED
57 corporations, the law of real property, and the law relative
58 to capacity to contract, principal and agent, eminent domain,
59 estoppel, fraud, misrepresentation, duress, coercion, mistake,
60 receivership, substantial performance, or other validating or
61 invalidating cause causes of action, as well as remedies of
62 reformation, injunction, and declaratory judgment, supplement
63 the provisions of this chapter, except to the extent
64 inconsistent with this chapter."
65 "§35-8A-110
66 (a) Notwithstanding a finding that this chapter is in
67 derogation of modifies the common law, it should be liberally
68 construed to effectuate its purpose of encouraging promote the
69 development and construction of condominium property
70 properties under the provisions of this chapter. The remedies
71 provided by this chapter shall be liberally administered to
72 the end that ensure the aggrieved party is put in as good a
73 position as if the other party had fully performed. These
74 remedies shall be available in addition, and not contrary to,
75 the remedies otherwise available at common law.
76 (b) Any right or obligation declared by this chapter is
77 enforceable by through judicial proceeding proceedings."
78 "§35-8A-205
79 (a) The declaration for a condominium must contain:
80 (1) The name of the condominium, which must include the
81 word "condominium" or be followed by the words "a
82 condominium," and the name of the association;
83 (2) The name of every county in which any part of the
84 condominium is situated;
Page 3

condominium is situated;
HB260 INTRODUCED
85 (3) A legally sufficient description of the real estate
86 included in the condominium;
87 (4) A statement of the maximum number of units which
88 the declarant reserves the right to create;
89 (5) A description of the boundaries of each unit
90 created by the declaration, including the unit's identifying
91 number;
92 (6) A description of any limited common elements, other
93 than those specified in Section 35-8A-202(2) and (4), as
94 provided in Section 35-8A-209(b)(10);
95 (7) A description of any common elements, (except real
96 estate subject to development rights) which, that may be
97 allocated subsequently as limited common elements, other than
98 limited common elements those specified in Section
99 35-8A-202(2) and (4), together with a statement that they may
100 be so allocated;
101 (8) A description of any development rights specified
102 in Section 35-8A-103(11) and other special declarant rights
103 specified in Section 35-8A-103(24) reserved by the declarant,
104 together with a legally sufficient description of the real
105 estate to which each of those rights applies, and a statement
106 of the time limit within which each of those rights must be
107 exercised;
108 (9) If any development right may be exercised with
109 respect to on different parcels of real estate at different
110 times, a statement to that effect together with that includes:
111 (i) either a statement fixing the boundaries of those portions
112 and regulating describing each parcel's boundaries and the
Page 4

and regulating describing each parcel's boundaries and the
HB260 INTRODUCED
113 order in which those portions may be subjected to the exercise
114 of each development right the development rights may be
115 exercised on them, or a statement that no such assurances are
116 made in those regards provided,; and (ii) a statement as to
117 whether, if any development right is exercised in any portion
118 of the real estate subject to that development right, that
119 development right must be exercised in all or in any other
120 portion of the remainder of that real estate exercising a
121 development right in one part of the real estate requires
122 exercising it in all or any other parts of the remaining
123 property;
124 (10) Any other conditions or limitations under which
125 the rights described in subdivision (8) may be exercised or
126 will lapse;
127 (11) An allocation to each unit of the allocated
128 interests in the manner described in Section 35-8A-207;
129 (12) Any restrictions on: (i) the use, occupancy,
130 leasing, or alienation of the units, provided that reasonable
131 rules and regulations related to concerning conduct by unit
132 owners or aesthetic considerations standards, which are
133 adopted by the association from time to time periodically by
134 the association need do not need to be included in the
135 declaration,; and (ii) the amount for which a unit may be sold
136 sale price of the unit or the amount that may be received by a
137 unit owner on a unit owner may receive upon sale,
138 condemnation, casualty loss to the unit or to the condominium,
139 or on the, or termination of the condominium;
140 (13) The recording data for recorded easements and
Page 5

(13) The recording data for recorded easements and
HB260 INTRODUCED
141 licenses appurtenant to or included in the condominium, or to
142 which any portion of the condominium is or may become subject
143 by virtue of a reservation in the declaration;
144 (14) A statement of the number and identity of units
145 which the declarant reserves the right to dispose of in time
146 shares; and
147 (15) All matters required by Sections 35-8A-206 through
148 35-8A-209, 35-8A-215, 35-8A-216, and 35-8A-303(d).
149 (b) The declaration may contain any other matters the
150 declarant deems appropriate."
151 "§35-8A-216
152 Subject to the provisions of the declaration, a
153 declarant only has an easement through the common elements as
154 may be reasonably necessary for the purpose of discharging to
155 discharge a declarant's obligations or exercising exercise
156 special declarant rights, whether arising under this chapter
157 or reserved in the declaration."
158 "§35-8A-302
159 (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), and subject
160 to the provisions of the declaration, the association may:
161 (1) Adopt and amend bylaws and rules and regulations;
162 (2) Adopt and amend budgets for revenues, expenditures,
163 and reserves and impose and collect assessments for common
164 expenses from unit owners;
165 (3) Hire and discharge managing agents and other
166 employees, agents, and independent contractors;
167 (4) Institute, defend, or intervene in litigation,
168 arbitration, mediation, or administrative proceedings in its
Page 6

arbitration, mediation, or administrative proceedings in its
HB260 INTRODUCED
169 own name on behalf of itself or two or more unit owners on
170 matters any matter affecting the condominium;
171 (5) Make contracts and incur liabilities;
172 (6) Regulate the use, maintenance, repair, replacement,
173 and modification of common elements;
174 (7) Cause additional improvements to be made as a part
175 of the common elements;
176 (8) Acquire, hold, encumber, and convey in its own name
177 any right, title, or interest to in real or personal property,
178 but interests in the common elements, other than those set
179 forth in subdivision (9), may be conveyed or subjected to a
180 security interest only pursuant to Section 35-8A-312;
181 (9) Grant easements, encroachments, leases, licenses,
182 and concessions through or over the common elements;
183 (10) Impose and receive any payments, fees, or charges
184 for the use, rental, or operation of the common elements,
185 other than limited common elements described in Section
186 35-8A-202(2) and (4), and for services provided to unit
187 owners;
188 (11) Impose against owners of units charges for late
189 payment of assessments and, after notice and an opportunity to
190 be heard, levy reasonable fines for violations of the
191 declaration, bylaws, and rules and regulations of the
192 association;
193 (12) Impose reasonable charges for the preparation and
194 recordation of amendments to the declaration, resale
195 certificates required by Section 35-8A-409, or statements of
196 unpaid assessments;
Page 7

unpaid assessments;
HB260 INTRODUCED
197 (13) Provide for the indemnification of its officers
198 and board and maintain directors' and officers' liability
199 insurance;
200 (14) Assign its right to future income, including the
201 right to receive common expense assessments, but only to the
202 extent the declaration expressly so provides, or as required
203 to secure a loan that is otherwise allowed or provided for in
204 the governing documents;
205 (15) Exercise any other powers conferred by the
206 declaration or bylaws;
207 (16) Exercise all other powers that may be exercised in
208 this state by legal entities of the same type as the
209 association; and
210 (17) Exercise any other powers necessary and proper for
211 the governance and operation of the association.
212 (b) The declaration may not impose limitations on the
213 power of the association to deal with the declarant which are
214 more restrictive than the limitations imposed on the power of
215 the association to deal with other persons."
216 "§35-8A-308
217 A There must be at least one meeting of the association
218 must be held at least once each year. Special meetings of the
219 association may be called by the president, a majority of the
220 board or by unit owners having 20 percent, or any lower
221 percentage specified in the bylaws, of the votes in the
222 association. Not less than 10 nor more than 60 days in advance
223 of any meeting, the secretary or other officer specified in
224 the bylaws shall cause notice to be hand-delivered or sent
Page 8

the bylaws shall cause notice to be hand-delivered or sent
HB260 INTRODUCED
225 prepaid by United States mail to the mailing address of each
226 unit or to any other mailing address designated in writing by
227 the unit owner. The notice of any meeting must state the time
228 and place of the meeting and the items on the agenda,
229 including the general nature of any proposed amendment to the
230 declaration or bylaws, any budget changes, and any proposal to
231 remove an officer or a member of the board."
232 "§35-8A-309
233 (a) Unless the bylaws provide otherwise, a quorum is
234 present throughout any meeting of the association if persons
235 entitled to cast 20 percent of the votes which that may be
236 cast for election of the board are present in person or by
237 proxy at the beginning of the said meeting.
238 (b) Unless the bylaws specify a larger percentage, a
239 quorum is deemed present throughout any meeting of the board
240 if persons entitled to cast 50 percent of the votes on that
241 board are present at the beginning of the said meeting."
242 "§35-8A-403
243 (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), an offering
244 statement must contain or fully and accurately disclose the
245 following information with regard to regarding the
246 condominium, including a or proposed condominium:
247 (1) The name and principal address of the declarant;
248 (2) The name and the address, legal description, or
249 other description of the location of the condominium, and the
250 number and types of units in the condominium;
251 (3) A general description of the condominium, including
252 to the extent possible, number and types of buildings,
Page 9

to the extent possible, number and types of buildings,
HB260 INTRODUCED
253 structures, and amenities the declarant is obligated to build,
254 and the declarant's schedule of commencement and completion of
255 construction of buildings, structures, and amenities the
256 declarant is obligated to include in the condominium;
257 (4) Copies of the declaration, as well as any recorded
258 plats, plans, easements, covenants, conditions, restrictions,
259 and reservations affecting the condominium; the certificate or
260 the proposed certificate of formation and the bylaws of the
261 association created or to be created to manage the
262 condominium, any rules or regulations of the association, a
263 copy of the lease for any leasehold condominium, copies of any
264 contracts and leases to be signed by purchasers at closing,
265 and copies of any contracts or leases that will or may be
266 subject to cancellation by the association under Section
267 35-8A-305;
268 (5) A projected budget for the association for at least
269 one year after the date or anticipated date of the first
270 conveyance to a purchaser, and thereafter the current budget
271 along with the current balance sheet of the association, a
272 statement of who prepared the budget, and a statement of the
273 budget's assumption concerning occupancy. The budget must
274 include, without limitation:
275 a. A statement of the amount, or a statement that there
276 is no amount, included in the budget as a reserve for repairs
277 and replacement;
278 b. A statement of any other reserves included in the
279 budget;
280 c. The projected common expenses by category of
Page 10

c. The projected common expenses by category of
HB260 INTRODUCED
281 expenditures for the association; and
282 d. The projected monthly common expense assessment for
283 each type of unit;
284 (6) Any services not reflected in the budget that the
285 declarant provides, or expenses that he or she pays, and that
286 he or she expects may become, at any subsequent time, a common
287 expense of the association and the projected common expense
288 assessment attributable to each of those services or expenses
289 for the association and for each type of unit;
290 (7) Any initial or special fee due from the purchaser
291 at closing together with a description of the purpose and
292 method of calculating the fee;
293 (8) A reference to, and a brief description of, any
294 liens, known defects, or encumbrances on or affecting the
295 title to the condominium;
296 (9) A description of any financing offered or arranged
297 by the declarant and, if the contract of sale offered to the
298 purchaser does not contain a provision conditioning
299 purchaser's obligation to perform the contract on obtaining
300 financing, a statement that the purchaser will forfeit any
301 deposit he or she has paid if the purchaser requires such
302 financing but does not qualify for such financing as is
303 offered or arranged by the declarant;
304 (10) The terms and significant limitations of any
305 warranties provided by the declarant, including statutory
306 warranties provided in this chapter and limitations on the
307 enforcement thereof or on damages;
308 (11) A statement that:
Page 11

(11) A statement that:
HB260 INTRODUCED
309 a. Within seven days after receipt of an offering
310 statement, a purchaser, before conveyance, may cancel any
311 contract for purchase of a unit from a declarant;
312 b. If a declarant fails to provide an offering
313 statement to a purchaser before conveying a unit, that
314 purchaser may rescind the conveyance within seven days after
315 first receiving the offering statement; and
316 c. If a purchaser receives the offering statement more
317 than seven days before signing a contract, he or she cannot
318 cancel the contract;
319 (12) A statement of any unsatisfied judgments or
320 pending lawsuits against the association; and including the
321 status of any pending lawsuits material related to the
322 condominium of which that a declarant has actual knowledge is
323 aware of;
324 (13) A statement that any deposit made in connection
325 with the purchase of a unit will be held in an escrow account
326 until closing and will be returned to the purchaser if the
327 purchaser cancels the contract pursuant to Section 35-8A-408,
328 together with the name and address of the escrow agent;
329 (14) Any restraints on sale or lease of any units in
330 the condominium and any restrictions:
331 a. On use, occupancy or alienation of the units,; and
332 b. On the amount for which a unit may be sold or on the
333 amount that may be received by a unit owner on sale,
334 condemnation, casualty loss to the unit or to the condominium,
335 or on the termination of the condominium;
336 (15) A brief description of the insurance coverage
Page 12

(15) A brief description of the insurance coverage
HB260 INTRODUCED
337 provided for the benefit of unit owners;
338 (16) Any current or expected fees or charges to be paid
339 by unit owners for the use of the common elements and other
340 facilities related to the condominium;
341 (17) The extent to which financial arrangements have
342 been provided for completion of all improvements that the
343 declarant is obligated to build pursuant to Section 35-8A-416
344 (Declarant's obligation to complete and restore);
345 (18) A brief narrative description of any zoning
346 affecting the condominium; and
347 (19) The applicable amendment requirements as provided
348 in the declaration or as provided by Alabama law.
349 (b) If a condominium composed of not more than 12 units
350 is not subject to any development rights, and no power is
351 reserved to a declarant to make the condominium part of a
352 larger condominium, group of condominiums, or other real
353 estate, an offering statement may, but need not, include the
354 information otherwise required by subdivisions (a) (9), (10),
355 (15), (16), (17), and (18) of subsection (a).
356 (c) A declarant shall promptly amend the offering
357 statement to report fully and accurately disclose any material
358 change in the information required by this section."
359 "§35-8A-408
360 (a) A person required to deliver the required documents
361 or report pursuant to Section 35-8A-402(c) or 35-8A-407 shall
362 provide a purchaser of a unit with a copy of the offering
363 statement and all amendments thereto not later than the date
364 of any contract of sale. Unless a purchaser is given the
Page 13

of any contract of sale. Unless a purchaser is given the
HB260 INTRODUCED
365 required documents more than seven days before execution of a
366 contract for the purchase of a unit, the purchaser may cancel
367 the contract within seven days after first receiving the
368 required documents or report.
369 (b) If a purchaser elects to cancel a contract or
370 conveyance pursuant to subsection (a), he or she may do so by
371 hand-delivering notice thereof to the offeror or by mailing
372 notice thereof by prepaid United States mail to the offeror or
373 to his or her agent for service of process. Cancellation is
374 without penalty, and all payments made by the purchaser before
375 cancellation shall be refunded promptly.
376 (c) If a person required to deliver an offering
377 statement or report pursuant to Section 35-8A-402(c) or
378 35-8A-407 willfully fails to provide a purchaser to whom a
379 unit is conveyed with the documents required by subsection
380 (a), the purchaser, at the purchaser's option and in lieu of
381 in addition to any rights to damages or other relief, is
382 entitled to receive from that person an amount equal to five
383 percent of the sales price of the unit if the purchaser
384 provides notice of the election to that person in the same
385 manner as described in subsection (b) within six months of the
386 date of conveyance of the unit."
387 "§35-8A-414
388 If a declarant or any other person subject to this
389 chapter fails to comply with any provision hereof of this
390 chapter or any provision of the declaration or bylaws, any
391 person or class of persons adversely affected by the failure
392 to comply has a claim for actual damages or appropriate
Page 14

to comply has a claim for actual damages or appropriate
HB260 INTRODUCED
393 equitable relief, which may include. The court, in an
394 appropriate case, may award reasonable attorney's attorney
395 fees to either party."
396 Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
397 1, 2026.
Page 15